Utah, session 2026, HB393.
Section 1. Section 53E-1-201 is amended to read:53E-1-201Effective 07/01/26Partially Repealed 07/01/27. Reports to and action required of the Education Interim Committee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Education Interim Committee:(a)the report described in Section 9-22-109 by the STEM Action Center Board, including the information described in Section 9-22-113 on the status of the computer science initiative and Section 9-22-114 on the Computing Partnerships Grants Program;(b)the prioritized list of data research described in Section 53H-15-303 and the report on research and activities described in Section 53H-15-305 by the Utah Data Research Center;(c)the report described in Section 53H-1-203 by the Utah Board of Higher Education on career and technical education issues and addressing workforce needs;(d)the annual report of the Utah Board of Higher Education described in Section 53H-1-203;(e)the reports described in Section 53H-7-603 by the Utah Board of Higher Education regarding activities related to campus safety;(f)the State Superintendent's Annual Report by the state board described in Section 53E-1-203;(g)the annual report described in Section 53E-2-202 by the state board on the strategic plan to improve student outcomes;(h)the report described in Section 53E-3-501 by the state board on students in an LEA who receive academic credit through the packet method;(i)the report described in Section 53E-8-204 by the state board on the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind;(j)the report described in Section 53E-10-703 by the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education director on research and other activities;(k)the report described in Section 53F-2-522 regarding mental health screening programs;(l)the report described in Section 53F-4-203 by the state board and the independent evaluator on an evaluation of early interactive reading software;(m)the reports described in Section 53F-5-224 by the state board and a district and charter school regarding the Dyslexia Screening Pilot Program;(m)(n)the report described in Section 53F-6-412 by the program manager of the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program;(n)(o)the report described in Section 63N-20-107 by the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity on UPSTART;(o)(p)the report described in Section 53F-5-215 by the state board related to a grant for an elementary teacher preparation assessment;(p)(q)upon request, the report described in Section 53F-5-219 by the state board on the Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program;(q)(r)the report described in Section 53F-5-405 by the state board regarding an evaluation of a partnership that receives a grant to improve educational outcomes for students who are low-income;(r)(s)the report described in Section 53H-1-604 regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council;(s)(t)the report described in Section 53G-7-221 by the state board regarding innovation plans; and(t)(u)the reports described in Section 53F-6-412 regarding the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following occasional reports are due to the Education Interim Committee:(a)in 2027, 2030, 2033, and 2035, the reports described in Sections 53H-1-502, 53H-1-503, and 53H-1-504;(b)in 2025, the report described in Section 53H-6-203 by a degree-granting institution regarding policies on abusive coaching practices;(c)if required, the report described in Section 53E-4-309 by the state board explaining the reasons for changing the grade level specification for the administration of specific assessments;(d)if required, the report described in Section 53E-5-210 by the state board of an adjustment to the minimum level that demonstrates proficiency for each statewide assessment;(e)the report described in Section 53E-10-702 by Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education;(f)if required, the report described in Section 53F-2-513 by the state board evaluating the effects of salary bonuses on the recruitment and retention of effective teachers in high-poverty schools;(g)upon request, the report described in Section 53F-10-303 by the state board regarding the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program;(h)upon request, a report described in Section 53G-7-222 by an LEA regarding expenditure of a percentage of state restricted funds to support an innovative education program;(i)the reports described in Section 53G-11-304 by the state board regarding proposed rules and results related to educator exit surveys; and(j)the report described in Section 26B-5-113 by the Office of Substance Use and Mental Health, the state board, and the Department of Health and Human Services regarding recommendations related to Medicaid reimbursement for school-based health services.(3)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, every five years the Education Interim Committee shall review the programs described in the following sections of code:(a)beginning July 1, 2027, Title 53E, Chapter 10, Part 3Chapter 10, Part 3, Concurrent Enrollment;(b)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-408, Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program;(c)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-409, Concurrent enrollment funding;(d)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-415, Student health and counseling support -- Qualifying personnel -- Distribution formula -- Rulemaking;(e)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-2-416, Appropriation and distribution for the Teacher and Student Success Program;(f)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-2-510, Digital Teaching and Learning Grant Program;(g)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-9-306, Teacher and Student Success Account;(h)beginning July 1, 2028, Title 53G, Chapter 7, Part 13, Teacher and Student Success Program; and(i)beginning July 1, 2029, Section 53F-2-502, Dual language immersion.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53F-5-224 is enacted to read:53F-5-224Effective 07/01/26. Dyslexia Screening Pilot Program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Dyslexia" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53E-4-307.(b)"Program" means the Dyslexia Screening Pilot Program created in Subsection (2).(c)"Rural elementary school" means a public elementary school located in a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class as described in Section 17-60-104.(d)"Screening" means the use of evidence-based measures to identify whether a student may:(i)be at risk for characteristics of dyslexia; and(ii)need additional assessment, progress monitoring, and intervention related to dyslexia.(e)"Urban elementary school" means a public elementary school located in a county of the first, second, or third class as described in Section 17-60-104.(2)There is created a four-year pilot program known as the Dyslexia Screening Pilot Program to:(a)provide dyslexia resources to a district and charter school;(b)provide dyslexia intervention to one rural elementary school and one urban elementary school;(c)create a statewide dyslexia intervention plan; and(d)create a dyslexia screener at the University of Utah Education Policy Center and the University of Utah College of Education.(3)The state board shall:(a)administer and oversee the program in coordination with the University of Utah Education Policy Center and the University of Utah College of Education;(b)solicit proposals from and select district and charter schools to participate in the program;(c)select one rural elementary school and one urban elementary school participating in the program to receive dyslexia intervention;(d)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, procure a vendor to provide the dyslexia intervention described in Subsection (3)(c);(e)identify and maintain an approved list of dyslexia screeners, including the screener developed under Subsection (5), that, in identifying risks for dyslexia and informing instructional decision-making, demonstrate evidence of validity and reliability;(f)report annually to the Education Interim Committee detailing:(i)the reports described in Subsections (5)(f) and (g); and(ii)the outcomes and effectiveness of the screener and dyslexia intervention; and(g)publish on the state board's website a webpage that:(i)provides a list of dyslexia screeners the state board approves district and charter schools to use for the program;(ii)provides additional dyslexia resources for parents, teachers, and students, including:(A)information on early indicators and reported risk factors;(B)characteristics of dyslexia and related literacy difficulties;(C)information on evidence-based instruction and intervention practices;(D)expectations for progress monitoring and communication; and(E)guidance on a referral process for diagnosis; and(iii)links to all other dyslexia resources the state board creates or approves.(4)To participate in the program, a district or charter school shall:(a)submit an application to the state board;(b)use the free dyslexia screener the University of Utah Education Policy Center and University of Utah College of Education develops in accordance with Subsection (5)(a); and(c)allocate funds from the district or charter school's budget to pay other costs incurred under the program.(5)The University of Utah Education Policy Center and the University of Utah College of Education shall:(a)work with the state board and stakeholders to develop and maintain a dyslexia screening process a district or charter school may use in accordance with the requirements of this section;(b)ensure that the screening process described in Subsection (5)(a):(i)is free to use for district and charter schools participating in the program;(ii)uses scientifically sound, evidence-based measures;(iii)aligns with nationally recognized best practices for dyslexia screening; and(iv)identifies indicators of risk for dyslexia for the purpose of informing:(A)instruction;(B)interventions;(C)progress monitoring;(D)reporting; and(E)further evaluation;(c)recommend to the state board the data elements the district and charter schools participating in the program should collect and report;(d)evaluate the program screener's validity, reliability, and usefulness in:(i)identifying a student at risk for dyslexia; and(ii)informing instruction and interventions;(e)in consultation with the state board, develop and maintain a comprehensive statewide dyslexia intervention plan, that:(i)establishes evidence-based standards for early identification and intervention for a student with dyslexia;(ii)provides guidance, resources, and best practices to district and charter schools; and(iii)promotes statewide coordination, training, and implementation of best practices for dyslexia intervention;(f)regarding the schools described in Subsection (3)(c) that the state board selects for dyslexia intervention, collaborate with the state board to:(i)evaluate the implementation and effectiveness of evidence-based interventions provided under the program, including:(A)analyses of student progress-monitoring data;(B)updates on a student's IEP or 504 Accommodation Plan;(C)intervention fidelity; and(D)student literacy outcomes; and(ii)report annually to the state board on the intervention outcomes described in this Subsection (5)(f);(g)report annually to the state board regarding the creation and outcomes of the screener developed under Subsection (5)(a);(h)use the reports the state board requires under Subsection (9)(b) to annually evaluate the program; and(i)provide professional learning for educators on:(i)recognizing early indicators and characteristics of dyslexia;(ii)using screeners and progress monitoring tools;(iii)implementing evidence-based instruction and intervention practices; and(iv)communicating with families.(6)The University of Utah Education Policy Center and the University of Utah College of Education may work in collaboration with the reading clinic at the University of Utah established in Section 53H-4-209 to implement the requirements of Subsection (5).(7)(a)A district or charter school shall use the state board approved list described in Subsection (3)(e) when screening a student for dyslexia.(b)A school district or charter school may use the dyslexia screening process the University of Utah Education Policy Center and the University of Utah College of Education develops under Subsection (5)(a), at no cost, to satisfy the requirements of this section.(8)Beginning July 1, 2027, a school district or charter school participating in the program:(a)shall use the state board approved screener to screen a student for dyslexia one time who:(i)scores below or well below average on the benchmark assessments described in Section 53E-4-307; and(ii)is in kindergarten, first grade, or was not tested in kindergarten or first grade and is demonstrating characteristics of dyslexia in second or third grade; and(b)shall provide additional screening to a student in kindergarten or first grade when teacher observation or parent concern indicates characteristics of dyslexia.(9)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the state board shall make rules to:(a)create an application process for a district or charter school to participate in the program;(b)create reporting requirements for a district or charter school participating in the program;(c)establish reporting requirements related to intervention delivery, including documentation of intervention, dosage, duration, and student response;(d)in accordance with Subsection (7)(a), enforce required dyslexia screening under the program;(e)create a process for reviewing and criteria for approving dyslexia screeners;(f)identify the intervals for administering the dyslexia screener; and(g)maintain accessibility for the screener for district and charter schools.(10)A district or charter school that participates in the pilot program or the state board shall report annually to the Education Interim Committee on the program's progress and outcomes.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63I-1-253 is amended to read:63I-1-253Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Section 53-1-122, Road Rage Awareness and Prevention Restricted Account, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 53-2a-105, Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function -- Composition -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 53-2a-1103, Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2030.(4)Section 53-2a-1104, General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 15, Grid Resilience Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 53-2d-104, State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Section 53-2d-503, Establishment of maximum rates, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 53-5a-302, Concealed Firearm Review Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 53-11-104, Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Title 53, Chapter 31, Department Interaction With Local Law Enforcement, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 53C-3-203(4)(b)(vii), regarding the distribution of money from the Land Exchange Distribution Account to the Geological Survey for test wells and other hydrologic studies in the West Desert, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)Subsection 53E-1-201(1)(q), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Subsection 53E-2-304(6), regarding foreclosing a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)Subsection 53E-3-503(5), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)Subsection 53E-3-503(6), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)Subsection 53E-4-202(8)(b), regarding a standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(17)Section 53E-4-203, Standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(18)Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 5, Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2033.(19)Subsection 53E-7-207(7), regarding a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(20)Section 53F-5-215, Elementary teacher preparation assessment grant, is repealed July 1, 2028.(21)Section 53F-5-219, Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(22)Section 53F-5-224, Dyslexia Screening Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2030.(22)(23)Title 53F, Chapter 10, Part 2, Capital Projects Evaluation Panel, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)(24)Subsection 53G-4-608(2)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(24)(25)Subsection 53G-4-608(4)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(25)(26)Section 53G-9-212, Drinking water quality in schools, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)(27)Subsection 53G-9-703(4), regarding the parental video presentation concerning student use of technology, is repealed January 1, 2030.(27)(28)Subsection 53H-1-402(1)(j), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(28)(29)Section 53H-1-604, Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(29)(30)Subsection 53H-4-210(3), regarding the creation of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(30)(31)Subsection 53H-4-210(4), regarding the appointment of the members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(31)(32)Subsection 53H-4-210(5), regarding the attorney general designating the chair of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(32)(33)Subsection 53H-4-210(6), regarding the quorum requirements of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(33)(34)Subsection 53H-4-210(7), regarding a formal action of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(34)(35)Subsection 53H-4-210(8), regarding compensation for members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(35)(36)Subsection 53H-4-210(9), regarding the support staff for the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(36)(37)Section 53H-4-306.1, Definitions -- Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center, is repealed July 1, 2028.(37)(38)Section 53H-4-306.2, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Designation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2028.(38)(39)Section 53H-4-306.3, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(39)(40)Section 53H-4-306.4, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Industry advisory board, is repealed July 1, 2028.(40)(41)Section 53H-4-306.5, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Duties of the project director, is repealed July 1, 2028.(41)(42)Section 53H-4-306.6, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Project development and strategic objectives -- Reporting requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(42)(43)Section 53H-4-307.1, Center for Civic Excellence, is repealed July 1, 2030.(43)(44)Section 53H-4-307.2, Center for Civic Excellence -- Duties -- Authority, is repealed July 1, 2030.(44)(45)Section 53H-4-307.3, Center for Civic Excellence -- Leadership, is repealed July 1, 2030.(45)(46)Section 53H-4-307.4, Center for Civic Excellence -- Faculty, is repealed July 1, 2030.(46)(47)Section 53H-4-307.5, Center for Civic Excellence -- Curriculum, is repealed July 1, 2030.(47)(48)Section 53H-4-307.6, Center for Civic Excellence -- Oversight -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(48)(49)Section 53H-4-313, Food Security Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(49)(50)Section 53H-8-305, Five-year performance goals, is repealed July 1, 2027.(50)(51)Title 53H, Chapter 10, Part 4, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.

Section 4:
Section 4.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 4(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 1State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time3,500,000Dyslexia Intervention Programs3,500,000The Legislature intends that the State Board of Education:(1) use $1,500,000 of the appropriation under this item to support the creation of the dyslexia screener at the University of Utah Education Policy Center as described in Section 53F-5-224;(2) use $1,700,00 of the appropriation under this item to support the development of the state's dyslexia intervention plan at the University of Utah as described in Section 53F-5-224;(3) use $300,000 of the appropriation under this item to procure a vendor to provide dyslexia intervention to two elementary schools as described in Section 53F-5-224; and(4) may use up to 5% of the appropriation under this item to cover administrative costs associated with the Dyslexia Screening Pilot Program.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.